Maryland, session 2025, HB0619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–245.
The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of:
(1) medical cannabis under Title 36 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article; [or]
(2) cannabis between cannabis businesses that are licensed under Title 36
of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article; OR
(3) CANNABIS BETWEEN A CANNABIS BUSINESS LICENSED UNDER
TITLE 36 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE AND A
CANNABIS NURSERY REGISTERED UNDER TITLE 36 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 1 –